Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-976
Investment services; charges; report;
state investment officer; duty.

Any funds of the retirement
system available for investment shall be invested by the Nebraska Investment
Council pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State
Funds Investment Act. Payment for investment services by the council shall
be charged directly against the gross investment returns of the funds. Charges
so incurred shall not be a part of the retirement board's annual budget request.
The amounts of payment for such services, as of December 31 of each year,
shall be reported not later than March 31 of the following year to the council,
the retirement board, and the Nebraska Retirement Systems Committee of the
Legislature. The report submitted
to the committee shall be submitted electronically. All money
received by the State Treasurer and the retirement board for the retirement
system shall be invested by the state investment officer within thirty-one
days after receipt.

Laws 1967, c. 546, § 17, p. 1809;

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 89, p. 2401;

Laws 1986, LB 311, § 21;

Laws 1988, LB 1170, § 20;

Laws 1991, LB 549, § 46;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 91;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1556;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 611;

Laws 2002, LB 407, § 45;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 156.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.